Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321.284, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 321.284 Open containers in motor vehicles ââ drivers. 1. A driver of person operating a motor vehicle upon a public street or highway shall not possess in the passenger area of the motor vehicle an open or unsealed bottle, can, House File 181, p. 2 jar, or other receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or a beverage containing any amount of tetrahydrocannabinol . âPassenger areaâ means the area designed to seat the driver and passengers while the motor vehicle is in operation and any area that is readily accessible to the driver or a passenger while in their seating positions, including the glove compartment. An open or unsealed receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or an otherwise lawful beverage containing tetrahydrocannabinol may be transported in the trunk of the motor vehicle. An unsealed receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or an otherwise lawful beverage containing tetrahydrocannabinol may be transported behind the last upright seat of the motor vehicle if the motor vehicle does not have a trunk. A person convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a simple misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled violation under section 805.8A, subsection 14 , paragraph âeâ . 2. A person under the age of twenty-one who violates possesses an alcoholic beverage in violation of this section is guilty of a violation of section 123.47 . Sec. 2. Section 321.284A, subsections 1 and 4, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 1. A passenger in a motor vehicle upon a public street or highway shall not possess in the passenger area of the motor vehicle an open or unsealed bottle, can, jar, or other receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or a beverage containing any amount of tetrahydrocannabinol . âPassenger areaâ means the area of a motor vehicle designed to seat the driver and passengers while the motor vehicle is in operation and any area that is readily accessible to the driver or a passenger while in their seating positions, including the glove compartment. An open or unsealed receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or an otherwise lawful beverage containing tetrahydrocannabinol may be transported in the trunk of the motor vehicle. An unsealed receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or an otherwise lawful beverage containing tetrahydrocannabinol may be transported behind the last upright seat of the motor vehicle if the motor vehicle does not have a trunk. House File 181, p. 3 4. A person under the age of twenty-one years who violates possesses an alcoholic beverage in violation of this section is guilty of a violation of section 123.47 . ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 181, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor